Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4527
Obligations.

A debt, liability, or other obligation enforceable against property of a first trust is enforceable to the same extent against the property when held by the second trust after exercise of the decanting power.

Laws 2020, LB808, § 37.